North Carolina, session 2025, SB558.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 116-11 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(9c) The Board of Governors shall adopt a policy on diversity, equity, and
inclusion at constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina that
complies with Article 39 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115D-5 is amended by adding the following new subsections
to read:
"(aa) The State Board shall adopt a policy on diversity, equity, and inclusion at community
colleges that complies with Article 39 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes.
(bb) The State Board shall adopt a policy prohibiting community colleges from
establishing, maintaining, or otherwise implementing a process for reporting or investigating
offensive or unwanted speech that is protected by the First Amendment, including satire or
speech labeled as microaggression."
SECTION 2. Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 39.
"Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion.
"§ 116-415. Intent.
*S558-v-4*

The General Assembly finds that Section 1 of Article I of the Constitution of this State
recognizes the equality and rights of all persons. Therefore, it is the intent of the General
Assembly that students, professors, administrators, and other employees of public institutions of
higher education respect the dignity of others, acknowledge the right of others to express
differing opinions, and foster and defend intellectual honesty, freedom of inquiry and instruction,
and freedom of speech and association and that the public institutions of higher education of this
State employ teaching methods and procedures to further that intent.
"§ 116-416. Definitions.
For the purposes of this Article, the following definitions apply:
(1) Applicable governing board. – As follows:
a. For a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, the
Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina.
b. For a community college, the State Board of Community Colleges.
(2) Chancellor. – The chancellor, president, or chief administrative officer of a
public institution of higher education.
(3) Discriminatory practice. – Any of the following based on an individual's
protected classification under federal law:
a. Treating an individual differently solely to advantage or disadvantage
that individual as compared to other individuals or groups.
b. Excluding an individual from employment, except as allowed under
federal law.
c. Excluding an individual from participation in an educational program
or activity, except as allowed under federal law.
(4) Divisive concept. – Any of the following concepts:
a. One race or sex is inherently superior to another race or sex.
b. An individual, solely by virtue of his or her race or sex, is inherently
racist, sexist, or oppressive.
c. An individual should be discriminated against or receive adverse
treatment solely or partly because of his or her race or sex.
d. An individual's moral character is necessarily determined by his or her
race or sex.
e. An individual, solely by virtue of his or her race or sex, bears
responsibility for actions committed in the past by other members of
the same race or sex.
f. Any individual, solely by virtue of his or her race or sex, should feel
discomfort, guilt, anguish, or any other form of psychological distress.
g. A meritocracy is inherently racist or sexist.
h. The United States was created by members of a particular race or sex
for the purpose of oppressing members of another race or sex.
i. Particular character traits, values, moral or ethical codes, privileges, or
beliefs should be ascribed to a race or sex or to an individual because
of the individual's race or sex.
j. The rule of law does not exist but instead is a series of power
relationships and struggles among racial or other groups.
k. All Americans are not created equal and are not endowed by their
Creator with certain unalienable rights, including life, liberty, and the
pursuit of happiness.
l. Governments should deny to any person within the government's
jurisdiction the equal protection of the law.
Page 2 Session Law 2026-21 Senate Bill 558

(5) Instruction. – Includes content taught or presented to students by employees,
contractors, or individuals otherwise engaged by a public institution of higher
education.
(6) Public institution of higher education. – A constituent institution of The
University of North Carolina or a community college as defined in
G.S. 115D-2(2).
"§ 116-417. Ensuring dignity and nondiscrimination in public institutions of higher
education.
(a) Public institutions of higher education shall not do any of the following:
(1) Engage in or advocate for discriminatory practices.
(2) Compel students, professors, administrators, or other employees to affirm or
profess belief in divisive concepts.
(3) Endorse divisive concepts.
(4) Maintain an office, division, or other unit (i) promoting discriminatory
practices or divisive concepts or (ii) referred to as or named diversity, equity,
and inclusion.
(5) Employ or assign an employee whose duties for a public institution of higher
education include promoting discriminatory practices or divisive concepts.
(6) Require completion of a course related to divisive concepts for purposes of
awarding a degree or completion of a program, except as provided in
subdivision (5) of subsection (b) of this section.
(b) This section shall not be construed to limit any of the following:
(1) Speech protected by the First Amendment of the U.S. Constitution.
(2) Materials accessed on an individual basis that advocate divisive concepts or
discriminatory practices for the purpose of research or independent study.
(3) Policies or procedures required by State or federal law.
(4) Instruction or discussion on divisive concepts that makes it clear the public
institution of higher education does not endorse divisive concepts.
(5) In the discretion of the chancellor, a course related to divisive concepts that is
required for a specific degree program. The chancellor shall report to the
applicable governing board on any course that is required under this
subdivision.
(c) Each public institution of higher education shall certify annually in writing by
September 1 to the applicable governing board that the public institution of higher education
fully complies with the requirements of this section, including any actions taken to achieve
compliance. The applicable governing board shall summarize the certifications in a consolidated
report by January 15 annually to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations
and the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee."
SECTION 3. For the certification due September 1, 2025, as required by
G.S. 116-417(c), as enacted by Section 2 of this act, each public institution of higher education
shall also include information on the initial implementation of this act, including reductions in
force and spending, changes to job titles and position descriptions, and how savings achieved
from these actions have been directed.
SECTION 4. G.S. 116-300 is amended by adding the following new subdivision to
read:
"(9) The constituent institution shall not establish, maintain, or otherwise
implement a process for reporting or investigating offensive or unwanted
speech that is protected by the First Amendment, including satire or speech
labeled as microaggression."
SECTION 5. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
Senate Bill 558 Session Law 2026-21 Page 3

without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 6. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 26th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
VETO Josh Stein
Governor
Became law notwithstanding the objections of the Governor at 3:25 p.m. this 24th day
of June, 2026.
s/ Mr. James White
House Principal Clerk
Page 4 Session Law 2026-21 Senate Bill 558